Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201581-3703
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Visitors Development Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 81-3704 to 81-3709 apply.

Laws 1980, LB 499, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 797, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 81-1246;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB449, § 11.
August 30, 2015